nl: Metertype: Analoog; Digitaal; Geen; Overig
hu: Műszer stílusa: Analóg; Digitális; Nincs; Egyéb
sl-SI: Slog merilnika: Analogni; Digitalni; Brez; Drugo
it: Stile dello strumento di misura: Analogico; Digitale; Nessuno; Altro
vi: Kiểu dáng đồng hồ đo: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Không có; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl meradla: Analógový; Digitálny; Žiadny; Iný
da: Målerens design: Analog; Digital; Ingen; Andet
ja: ゲージスタイル: アナログ; デジタル; なし; その他
en: Gauge style: Analog; Digital; None; Other
th: รูปแบบเกจ: อะนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl przyrządu pomiarowego: Analogowy; Cyfrowy; Brak; Inny
sv: Typ av mätare: Analog; Digital; Ingen; Övrigt
pt-PT: Estilo de medidor: Analógico; Digital; Nenhum; Outro
lt-LT: Matuoklio stilius: Analoginis; Skaitmeninis; Nėra; Kita
ru: Стиль датчика: Аналоговый; Цифровой; Нет; Другое
bg-BG: Стил на измервателния уред: Аналогов; Цифров; Няма; Друго
es: Estilo de calibre: Analógico; Digital; Ninguno; Otro
fr: Style de jauge: Analogique; Numérique; Aucun; Autre
de: Messgerätstil: Analog; Digital; Keine; Sonstige
ro-RO: Stil al manometrului: Analogic; Digital; Niciuna; Altele
hr-HR: Stil mjerača: Analogni; Digitalni; Ništa; Ostalo
zh-TW: 儀表樣式: 類比; 數位; 無; 其他
nb: Målerstil: Analog; Digital; Ingen; Annet
cs: Styl manometru: Analogový; Digitální; Žádný; Ostatní
el: Στυλ μετρητή: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακό; Κανένα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 仪表样式: 模拟; 数字; 无; 其他
tr: Gösterge stili: Analog; Dijital; Yok; Diğer
ko: 게이지 스타일: 아날로그; 디지털; 없음; 기타
pt-BR: Estilo do medidor: Analógico; Digital; Nenhum; Outro
fi: Mittarin tyyli: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Ei mitään; Muu